Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-10,126
Nail technology activities; licensure required.

Licensure shall be required before any person may engage in the full, unsupervised practice of nail technology. No person may assume the title of nail technician or nail technology instructor without first being licensed under the Cosmetology, Electrology, Esthetics, Nail Technology, and Body Art Practice Act. No person, group, company, or other entity shall operate, advertise, or hold himself, herself, or itself out as operating a nail technology establishment in which any of the practices of nail technology are carried out unless such nail technology establishment is licensed under the act. No person shall provide nail technology services unless he or she practices in a currently licensed cosmetology establishment or nail technology establishment.

Laws 1999, LB 68, § 28;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-3,180;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 388.